Utah statutes.
32B-9-405.   Specific permitting requirements for temporary beer event permit issued by commission.

(1)  To obtain a temporary beer event permit, in addition to complying with Part 2, Event Permitting General Provisions, a person shall state in the person's written application the purpose of the event for which the person seeks a temporary beer event permit.

(2)  The application fee for a beer permit is $100.

(3)  The bond amount required for a beer permit is the penal sum of $500.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

